Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 41.3 Automated School-Zone-Speed-Enforcement System Act of 2016

31-41.3-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Automated School-Zone-Speed-Enforcement System Act of 2016.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared that ever-increasing violations of the state’s school-zone speed laws and regulations place both motorists and students using the state’s streets and roadways within school zones in danger. The legislature hereby declares that the use of technology to reduce aggressive and dangerous speeding is in the best interest of public safety and therefore adopts a policy of authorizing the use of automated traffic-speed-enforcement systems in school zones within the state of Rhode Island. These systems shall be used in conjunction with civil penalties imposed upon the owners of speeding vehicles in order to reduce speeding violations.

Nothing in this chapter shall supersede any criminal or civil penalty or sanction against the driver of a vehicle who is cited by a law enforcement officer for a speeding violation in a school zone.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-3.
Automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system authorized and defined.

The state department of transportation and the municipalities of this state are hereby authorized to operate “automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems.”

For the purposes of this chapter:

An “automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system” is an automated traffic-speed-enforcement system operated within one-quarter (1/4) mile of any type of school in the state of Rhode Island;

An “automated traffic-speed-enforcement system” is defined as a system using one or more vehicle detectors in combination with photography to identify and provide a photographic image of vehicles which are exceeding the posted speed limit, or the speed limit designated by state law or regulation, for a given school zone, and may be in fixed or mobile configurations; and

A “school zone” is defined as anywhere within a one-quarter (1/4) mile radius of any type of school in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-4.
Automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system operational requirements and certification.

No automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall be used in the state of Rhode Island unless the system has been approved and certified for use in the state by the director of the department of transportation. The director of the department of transportation, in cooperation with the state police, shall require that any automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system approved and certified for use in the state of Rhode Island meets the following requirements:

All automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems operated under this chapter shall record the speed of vehicles within plus or minus one mile per hour of the actual speed.

All automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems operated under this chapter shall record at least two (2) photographic images of the vehicle exceeding the speed limit, one of which shall include the license plate attached to the rear of the vehicle.

All automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems operated under this chapter shall, at the time of violation, imprint upon the photographic images of vehicles exceeding the speed limit:

The date and time of the violation; and

The identity of the street, or school zone being monitored, and location upon that street, or within that school zone, including the direction of travel and lane of travel; this requirement may be met with code designations; and

The posted or lawfully designated speed limit for the street or school zone being monitored; and

The monitored speed of the vehicle identified in the photographic images as exceeding the posted or lawfully designated school zone speed limit; and

The consecutive event number of each photograph taken.

At least one hundred feet (100´) prior to entering an automated school-zone area where a speed-enforcement system is being operated, and on each approach to that area, four (4) signs, each measuring three feet (3´) in height by four feet (4´) in width, shall be erected in locations where the view is unobstructed, warning motorists that they will be entering an area monitored by an automated speed-zone-enforcement system and that violators of speed limitations may be prosecuted. The automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall be operational only from seven o’clock a.m. (7:00 a.m.) to six o’clock p.m. (6:00 p.m.) on school days of the promulgated one-hundred-eighty-day (180) school calendar year adopted in the applicable community.

It shall be the vendor’s responsibility to furnish an annual report with all pertinent data to the speaker of the house and the senate president.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 316, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 353, § 2.

31-41.3-5.
Operation of system.

In the event a fixed or mobile automated traffic-speed-enforcement system is to be installed or used by any person other than the state department of transportation or state police personnel on a state maintained street, roadway or highway, the director of transportation shall approve installation or use of the system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-6.
Maintenance of system.

The state department of transportation, and/or the municipalities, may enter into an agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems equipment services and to maintain the systems. A contract between a government agency and a manufacturer or supplier of automated traffic-speed-enforcement systems shall be based on the value of such equipment and related support services and shall not be based on a percentage of the revenue generated by the automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-7.
Citation precedent.

In the event a law enforcement officer stops and issues a citation to the driver of a vehicle for a speeding violation, which violation is also captured by an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system, the citation issued to the driver by the law enforcement officer shall have and take precedence, and the automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system citation shall be dismissed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-8.
Procedure — Notice.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, all prosecutions based on evidence produced by an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall follow the procedures established in chapter 41.1 of this title, chapter 18 of title 8, and the rules promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal for the hearing of civil traffic violations. Citations may be issued by an officer solely based on evidence obtained by use of an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system. All citations issued based on evidence obtained from an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall be issued within fourteen (14) days of the violation.

It shall be sufficient to commence a prosecution based on evidence obtained from an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system, provided that a copy of the citation and supporting documentation be mailed to the address of the registered owner kept on file by the registry of motor vehicles pursuant to §

31-3-34

. For purposes of this section, the date of issuance shall be the date of mailing.

The officer issuing the citation shall certify under penalties of perjury that the evidence obtained from the automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system was sufficient to demonstrate a violation of the motor vehicle code. Such certification shall be sufficient in all prosecutions pursuant to this chapter to justify the entry of a default judgment upon sufficient proof of actual notice in all cases where the citation is not answered within the time period permitted.

The citation shall contain all the information provided for in the uniform summons as referred to in §

31-41.1-1

and the rules of procedure promulgated by the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal.

In addition to the information in the uniform summons, the following information shall be attached to the citation:

Copies of two (2) or more photographs, or microphotographs, or other recorded images taken as proof of the violation; and

A signed statement by a trained law enforcement officer that, based on inspection of recorded images, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of chapter 14 of title 31 relating to speed restrictions; and

A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of this chapter; and

A statement that the person who receives a summons under this chapter may either pay the civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of §

31-41.1-3

, or elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 13.

31-41.3-9.
Hearings.

Evidence from an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall be considered substantive evidence in the prosecution of all civil traffic violations. Evidence from an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system approved by the director of the department of transportation shall be admitted without further authentication and such evidence may be deemed sufficient to sustain a civil traffic violation. In addition to any other defenses as set forth herein, any defenses cognizable at law, with the exception of that available under §

31-41.1-7

, shall be available to the individual who receives the citation commencing a prosecution under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-10.
Driver/registered owner liability.

The registered owner of the motor vehicle shall be primarily responsible in all prosecutions brought pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this section.

In all prosecutions of civil school-zone violations based on evidence obtained from an automated traffic-speed-enforcement system, the registered owner of a vehicle which has been operated in violation of a civil traffic violation, may be liable for such violation. The registered owner of the vehicle may assume liability for the violation by paying the fine, or by defending the violation pursuant to the remedies available under the law.

The lessee of a leased vehicle shall be considered the owner of a motor vehicle for purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-11.
Use of evidence in criminal and civil cases.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the use of evidence produced by an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system in a criminal or civil proceeding; provided, that the admissibility of such evidence shall follow the applicable laws and rules of procedure and rules of evidence which apply in criminal and civil proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-12.
Nature of violations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

No violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this chapter shall be considered a moving violation; nor shall it be included on the driving record of the person on whom the liability is imposed; nor shall it be used for insurance rating purposes in providing motor vehicle insurance coverage.

Impositions of a penalty pursuant to this chapter shall not be deemed a criminal conviction of an owner or operator.

The defense available under §

31-41.1-7

shall not be available for any violation imposed under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 316, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 353, § 3.

31-41.3-13.
Security of records.

The recorded images produced by an automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system shall not be deemed “public records” subject to disclosure pursuant to §

38-2-2

.

All recorded images that do not identify a violation shall be destroyed within ninety (90) days of the date the image was recorded, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

All recorded images that identify a violation shall be destroyed within one year after the citation is resolved by administrative payment, trial, or other final disposition of the citation, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The privacy of records produced pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained; provided, that aggregate data not containing personal identifying information may be released.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-14.
Reports.

The agency or municipality authorizing the installation of automated school-zone-speed-enforcement systems shall prepare an annual report containing data on:

The number of citations issued at each particular school zone;

The number of those violations paid by mail;

The number of those violations found after trial or hearing;

The number of violations dismissed after trial or hearing;

The number of accidents at each school zone;

A description as to the type of accident;

An indication regarding whether there were any injuries involved in any accident reported;

The cost to maintain the automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system; and

The amount of revenue obtained from the automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 165, § 1.

31-41.3-15.
Penalties.

Every person found to have violated the provisions of this chapter shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense; provided, however that for a period of thirty (30) days following the installation of any new automated school-zone-speed-enforcement system, a violation recorded by the system shall only be enforced by the issuance of a warning.

A violation of this chapter shall not be considered a moving violation for purposes of the motorist’s driving record.

Every three (3) years from the date of the motorist’s first offense under this chapter, the court shall expunge any automated school-zone-speed-enforcement violations during the preceding three-year (3) period.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 316, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 353, § 4.